Illinois, session 104th, SB2781.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 5changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 10/4)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2404)7    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.9    "Occupational license" means a license issued by the Board 10to a person or entity to perform an occupation which the Board 11has identified as requiring a license to engage in riverboat 12gambling, casino gambling, or gaming pursuant to an 13organization gaming license issued under this Act in Illinois.14    "Gambling game" includes, but is not limited to, baccarat, 15twenty-one, poker, craps, slot machine, video game of chance, 16roulette wheel, klondike table, punchboard, faro layout, keno 17layout, numbers ticket, push card, jar ticket, or pull tab 18which is authorized by the Board as a wagering device under 19this Act.20    "Riverboat" means a self-propelled excursion boat, a 21permanently moored barge, or permanently moored barges that 22are permanently fixed together to operate as one vessel, on 23which lawful gambling is authorized and licensed as provided   SB2781- 2 -LRB104 16773 LNS 30182 b1in this Act.2    "Slot machine" means any mechanical, electrical, or other 3device, contrivance, or machine that is authorized by the 4Board as a wagering device under this Act which, upon 5insertion of a coin, currency, token, or similar object 6therein, or upon payment of any consideration whatsoever, is 7available to play or operate, the play or operation of which 8may deliver or entitle the person playing or operating the 9machine to receive cash, premiums, merchandise, tokens, or 10anything of value whatsoever, whether the payoff is made 11automatically from the machine or in any other manner 12whatsoever. A slot machine:13        (1) may utilize spinning reels or video displays or 14    both;15        (2) may or may not dispense coins, tickets, or tokens 16    to winning patrons;17        (3) may use an electronic credit system for receiving 18    wagers and making payouts; and19        (4) may simulate a table game. 20    "Slot machine" does not include table games authorized by 21the Board as a wagering device under this Act. 22    "Managers license" means a license issued by the Board to 23a person or entity to manage gambling operations conducted by 24the State pursuant to Section 7.3.25    "Dock" means the location where a riverboat moors for the 26purpose of embarking passengers for and disembarking   SB2781- 3 -LRB104 16773 LNS 30182 b1passengers from the riverboat.2    "Gross receipts" means the total amount of money exchanged 3for the purchase of chips, tokens, or electronic cards by 4riverboat patrons.5    "Adjusted gross receipts" means the total of all cash and 6cash equivalents received by a licensee minus the total of:7        (1) all cash and cash equivalents paid out as winnings 8    to wagerers;9        (2) the actual costs paid by a licensee for anything 10    of value provided to and redeemed by wagerers, including 11    merchandise or services distributed to wagerers to 12    incentivize wagering;13        (3) voided or cancelled wagers; and14        (4) the costs of free play or promotional credits 15    provided to and redeemed by the applicable licensee's 16    wagerers. gross receipts less winnings paid to wagerers.17    "Cheat" means to alter the selection of criteria which 18determine the result of a gambling game or the amount or 19frequency of payment in a gambling game.20    "Gambling operation" means the conduct of gambling games 21authorized under this Act upon a riverboat or in a casino or 22authorized under this Act and the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 231975 at an organization gaming facility.24    "License bid" means the lump sum amount of money that an 25applicant bids and agrees to pay the State in return for an 26owners license that is issued or re-issued on or after July 1,   SB2781- 4 -LRB104 16773 LNS 30182 b12003.2    "Table game" means a live gaming apparatus upon which 3gaming is conducted or that determines an outcome that is the 4object of a wager, including, but not limited to, baccarat, 5twenty-one, blackjack, poker, craps, roulette wheel, klondike 6table, punchboard, faro layout, keno layout, numbers ticket, 7push card, jar ticket, pull tab, or other similar games that 8are authorized by the Board as a wagering device under this 9Act. "Table game" does not include slot machines or video 10games of chance.11    The terms "minority person", "woman", and "person with a 12disability" shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 132 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and 14Persons with Disabilities Act.15    "Casino" means a facility at which lawful gambling is 16authorized as provided in this Act. 17    "Owners license" means a license to conduct riverboat or 18casino gambling operations, but does not include an 19organization gaming license.20    "Licensed owner" means a person who holds an owners 21license.22    "Organization gaming facility" means that portion of an 23organization licensee's racetrack facilities at which gaming 24authorized under Section 7.7 is conducted.25    "Organization gaming license" means a license issued by 26the Illinois Gaming Board under Section 7.7 of this Act   SB2781- 5 -LRB104 16773 LNS 30182 b1authorizing gaming pursuant to that Section at an organization 2gaming facility.3    "Organization gaming licensee" means an entity that holds 4an organization gaming license.5    "Organization licensee" means an entity authorized by the 6Illinois Racing Board to conduct pari-mutuel wagering in 7accordance with the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. With 8respect only to gaming pursuant to an organization gaming 9license, "organization licensee" includes the authorization 10for gaming created under subsection (a) of Section 56 of the 11Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. 12(Source: P.A. 100-391, eff. 8-25-17; 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)